California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) For a placement made on and after October 1, 2021, each placement of the minor or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic program, including the initial placement and each subsequent placement into a short-term residential therapeutic program, shall be reviewed by the court within 45 days of the start of placement in accordance with this section. In no event shall the court grant a continuance pursuant to Section 682 that would cause the review to be completed more than 60 days after the start of the placement.

(2) For a placement made on and after July 1, 2022, each placement of the minor or nonminor dependent in a community treatment facility, including the initial placement and each subsequent placement into a community treatment facility, shall be reviewed by the court within 45 days of the start of placement in accordance with this section. In no event shall the court grant a continuance pursuant to Section 682 that would cause the review to be completed more than 60 days after the start of the placement.

(b) (1) At any time after the decision to place a minor or nonminor dependent into a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community treatment facility has
 been made, but no later than five calendar days
 following each
 placement,
 the probation officer shall request the juvenile court to schedule a hearing to review the placement.

(2) The probation officer shall serve a copy of the request on all parties to the delinquency proceeding, the minor’s court-appointed special advocate, if applicable, and the minor’s tribe in the case of an Indian child to whom subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1 applies.

(c) (1) The probation officer shall prepare and submit a report that shall include all of the following:

(A) A copy of the assessment, determination, and documentation prepared by the qualified individual pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096.

(B) The case plan documentation required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 706.6.

(C) In the case of an Indian child, a statement regarding whether the minor’s tribe had an opportunity to confer regarding the departure from the placement preferences described in Section 361.31, and the active efforts made prior to placement in a short-term therapeutic program or community treatment facility to satisfy subdivision (f) of Section 224.1.

(D) A statement regarding whether the minor or nonminor dependent or any party to the proceeding, or minor’s tribe in the case of an Indian child to whom subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1 applies, objects
 to the placement of the minor or nonminor dependent in the short-term residential therapeutic
 program or community treatment facility.

(2) The probation officer shall serve a copy of the report on all parties to the proceeding no later than seven calendar days before the hearing.

(d) Within five calendar days of the request described in subdivision (b), the court shall set a hearing to be held within 45 days after the start of the placement and give notice of the hearing to all parties to the proceeding, and the minor’s tribe in the case of an Indian child to whom subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1 applies.

(e) When reviewing each placement of the minor or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic
 program or community treatment facility, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the information specified in subdivision (c).

(2) Determine whether the needs of the minor or nonminor dependent can be met through placement in a family-based setting, or, if not, whether placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program
 or community treatment facility, as applicable, provides the most effective and appropriate care setting for the minor or nonminor dependent in the least restrictive environment. A shortage or lack of resource family homes shall not be an acceptable reason for determining that the needs of the minor or nonminor dependent cannot be met in a family-based setting.

(3) Determine whether the short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility level of care, as applicable,
 is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the minor or nonminor dependent.

(4) In the case of an Indian child, determine whether there is good cause to depart from the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(5) Approve or disapprove the placement.

(6) Make a finding, either in writing or on the record, of the basis for its determinations pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the court disapproves the placement, the court shall order the probation officer to transition the minor or nonminor dependent to a placement setting that is consistent with the determinations made pursuant to subdivision (e) within 30 days of the disapproval.

(g) This section does not prohibit the court from reviewing the placement of a minor or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic program
 or community treatment facility pursuant to subdivision (a) at a regularly scheduled hearing if that hearing is held within 60 days of the placement and the information described in subdivision (c) has been presented to the court.

(h) (1) On or before October 1, 2021, for placements into a short-term residential therapeutic program, the Judicial Council shall amend or adopt rules of court and shall develop or amend appropriate forms, as necessary, to implement this section, including developing a procedure to enable the court to review the placement without a hearing.

(2) On or before October 1, 2022, for placements into a community treatment facility, the Judicial Council shall amend or adopt rules of court and shall develop or amend appropriate forms, as necessary, to implement this section, including developing a procedure to enable the court to review the placement without a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 26.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

727.13.

(a) (1) Whenever voluntary admission into a psychiatric residential treatment facility is sought for a minor or nonminor dependent who is subject to a petition pursuant to Section 601 or 602, the court shall review the application for a voluntary admission as described in this section. A minor may not be admitted for inpatient treatment prior to court authorization unless the minor is subject to an involuntary hold pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5585.50) of Part 1.5 of Division 5.

(2) For purposes of this section, “voluntary admission” for a child within the custody of a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian refers to the parent, guardian, or Indian
 custodian’s voluntary decision to have the child admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility. “Voluntary admission” for a child not within the custody of a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian refers to the child’s decision to voluntarily admit themselves pursuant to Section 6552. “Voluntary admission” for a nonminor dependent refers to the nonminor dependent’s decision to voluntarily admit themselves.

(b) (1) When a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian who retains physical custody of a minor under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 seeks to have a minor admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, or when a minor who is the subject of a petition pursuant to Section 601 or 602 seeks to make a voluntary admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility,
 the probation officer shall file an ex parte application for an order authorizing the voluntary admission pursuant to Section 6552 within 48 hours of being informed of the request or, if the courts are closed for more than 48 hours after being informed of the request, on the first judicial day after being informed of the request. The application shall satisfy the requirements of Title 3 of the California Rules of Court, and include all of the following:

(A) A brief description of the minor mental disorder.

(B) The name of the psychiatric residential treatment facility proposed for treatment.

(C) A brief description of how the mental disorder may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by the course of treatment
 offered by the psychiatric residential treatment facility.

(D) A brief description of why the facility is the least restrictive setting for care and why there are no other available hospitals, programs, or facilities which might better serve the minor’s medical needs and best interest.

(E) A copy of the plan required by subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10.

(F) (i) If the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is seeking the minor’s admission to the facility, the basis of their belief that the minor’s admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility is necessary.

(ii) If the minor is seeking admission, whether the parent, guardian,
 or Indian custodian agrees with the minor request for admission.

(G) A description of any mental health services, including community-based mental health services, that were offered or provided and an explanation for why those services were not sufficient, or an explanation for why no such services were offered or provided.

(H) A statement describing how the minor was given the opportunity to confer privately with their counsel regarding the application.

(I) A brief description of whether any member of the minor’s child and family team, if applicable, objects to the admission, and the reasons for the objection, if any.

(J) The information required by
 this paragraph shall be sufficient to satisfy the applicant’s initial burden of establishing the need for an ex parte hearing required by subdivision (c) of Rule 3.1202 of the California Rules of Court.

(2) Upon receipt of an ex parte application pursuant to paragraph (1), the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing for the next judicial day. The court clerk shall immediately notify the probation officer and the minor’s counsel of the date, time, and place for the hearing.

(3) The probation officer shall provide notice of the hearing in accordance with Title 3 of the California Rules of Court to the minor and their counsel of record, the minor’s parents or guardian, the minor’s tribe in the case of an Indian child, and any person designated as the minor’s educational or developmental representative
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 726. The provisions in subdivision (c) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to notice of the hearing. The probation officer shall make arrangements for the minor to be transported to the hearing.

(c) (1) At the hearing, the court shall consider evidence in the form of oral testimony under oath, affidavit, or declaration, or other admissible evidence, including a probation department court report, as to all of the following:

(A) Whether the minor suffers from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the psychiatric residential treatment facility in which the minor wishes to be placed.

(B) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility is the least restrictive setting for care.

(C) Whether there is any other available hospital, program, or facility which might better serve the minor’s medical needs and best interest, including less restrictive facilities or community-based care.

(D) Whether and how the minor, parent, or legal guardian, as appropriate, has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(E) Whether and how the probation officer addressed the possible voluntary admission with the minor’s attorney.

(F) Whether the minor was given the opportunity to confer privately with their attorney while considering a voluntary admission.

(G) Whether and how the possible voluntary admission was addressed with the child and family team, whether any member of the team objects to voluntary admission, and the reasons for the objection.

(H) The probation department’s plan for the minor, as described in Section 16010.10.

(I) A brief description of any community-based mental health services that were offered or provided, or an explanation for why no such services were offered or provided.

(2) (A) If the minor’s parent, guardian, or Indian
 custodian seeks to give voluntary consent to the child’s admission, the court shall inquire about the child’s position on the admission.

(B) If the minor seeks to give voluntary consent to admission, the court shall inquire of the minor whether they knowingly and intelligently consent to admission into the psychiatric residential treatment facility, and whether they are giving consent without fear or threat of detention or initiation of conservatorship proceedings.

(3) The court shall not continue the hearing unless the minor consents to the continuance and the court determines that additional evidence is necessary to support the findings required by subdivision (c). Any continuance shall be for only such period of time as is necessary to obtain the evidence and only if it is
 not detrimental to the minor’s health condition.

(d) (1) The court may grant a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian’s request to have a child admitted, or authorize the minor’s voluntary consent to admission, into a psychiatric residential treatment facility only if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) That the minor suffers from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the hospital, facility, or program in which the minor wishes to be placed.

(B) That the psychiatric residential treatment facility is the least restrictive setting to treat the child’s mental disorder.

(C) That there is no other available hospital, program, facility, or community-based care which might better serve the minor’s medical needs and best interest.

(D) That the minor has given knowing and intelligent consent to admission to the facility and that the consent was not made under fear or threat of detention or initiation of conservatorship proceedings.

(E) That the minor and, where appropriate, the parent or guardian have been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(2) (A) When authorizing a parent’s or guardian’s
 consent to admission or the minor’s voluntary consent, the court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the child welfare services agency promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the minor is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition into a less restrictive setting.

(B) The court’s order authorizing the admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall be effective until the first of the following events occurs: (1) the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian, or the child if admission was granted pursuant to Section 6552, withdraws consent for the child to be present in the psychiatric residential treatment facility, (2) the court finds that the child no longer suffers from a mental disorder that may reasonably expected to be
 ameliorated by the treatment offered by the facility or that the psychiatric residential treatment facility is no longer the least restrictive setting for the treatment of the child’s mental health needs, or (3) the court makes a superseding order.

(3) For minors who were in the custody of their parent, legal guardian or Indian custodian at the time of the authorization of admission, and based on the evidence presented during the ex parte hearing, the court shall consider whether the parent’s, legal guardian’s or Indian custodian’s conduct contributed to the deterioration of the minor’s mental disorder. If the court determines that the parent’s, legal guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s conduct may have contributed to the deterioration, it shall direct the county probation department to investigate whether the child may be safely returned to the
 custody of the parent, legal guardian or Indian custodian upon their discharge from the psychiatric residential treatment facility and to take appropriate action, including, but not limited to, assessing the minor pursuant to Section 241.1, making a report to the county child welfare services agency’s suspected child abuse and neglect hotline, or proceeding to modify court orders pursuant to Article 20 (commencing with Section 775).

(e) (1) Whenever a nonminor dependent under the supervision of a county juvenile probation department seeks to voluntarily consent to admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, the probation officer shall file an ex parte application within 48 hours of the request or, if the courts are closed for more than 48 hours after being informed of the request, on the first judicial day after
 being informed of the request, for a hearing to address whether the nonminor dependent has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate, and gives informed voluntary consent to admission. The application shall satisfy the requirements of Title 3 of the California Rules of Court, and include all of the following:

(A) A brief description of the medical necessity for admission into a psychiatric residential treatment facility.

(B) The name of the psychiatric residential treatment facility proposed for treatment.

(C) A copy of the probation department’s plan developed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d)
 of Section 16010.10.

(D) A description of any mental health services, including community-based mental health services, that were offered or provided to the nonminor dependent and an explanation for why those services were not sufficient, or an explanation for why no such services were offered or provided.

(E) A brief description of whether the nonminor dependent believes admission to a less restrictive facility would not adequately address their mental disorder.

(F) A statement describing how the nonminor dependent was given the opportunity to confer privately with their counsel regarding the application.

(G) The information required by this paragraph shall be considered
 sufficient to satisfy the applicant’s initial burden of establishing the need for an ex parte hearing required by subdivision (c) of Rule 3.1202 of the California Rules of Court.

(2) Upon receipt of an ex parte application pursuant to paragraph (1), the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing for the next judicial day. The court clerk shall immediately notify the probation officer and the nonminor dependent’s counsel of the date, time, and place for the hearing.

(3) The probation officer shall provide notice of the hearing in accordance with Title 3 of the California Rules of Court to all parties to the proceeding and their counsel of record, the nonminor dependent’s tribe, if applicable, the nonminor dependent’s court-appointed special advocate, if applicable, and any person designated
 as the nonminor dependent’s educational or developmental representative pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 726. The provisions in subdivision (c) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to notice of the hearing. The probation officer shall make arrangements for the nonminor dependent to be present for the hearing.

(4) At the hearing, the court shall consider evidence in the form of oral testimony under oath, affidavit, or declaration, or other admissible evidence, as to all of the following:

(A) Whether the nonminor dependent’s receipt of treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility is medically necessary.

(B) Whether there is an available less restrictive setting sufficient to
 meet the nonminor dependent’s needs, including a less restrictive facility or community-based care.

(C) Whether and how the nonminor dependent has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(D) Whether and how the probation officer addressed the voluntary admission with the nonminor dependent’s attorney, including whether the nonminor dependent was given the opportunity to confer privately with their attorney about a voluntary admission.

(E) Whether and how the possible voluntary admission was addressed with the child and family team, whether any member of the team objects to voluntary admission, and
 the reasons for the objection.

(F) The probation department’s plan for the nonminor dependent, as described in Section 16010.10.

(5) (A) The court shall make a finding whether the nonminor dependent has given knowing and intelligent consent to admission. If the court finds that the nonminor dependent has not given knowing and intelligent consent, it shall direct the probation officer to convey its finding to the facility and direct the facility to discharge the nonminor dependent. If the court finds that the nonminor dependent has given knowing and intelligent consent, nothing in this section requires a court order to discharge the nonminor if the nonminor dependent subsequently withdraws their consent.

(B) The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the probation department promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the nonminor dependent is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition into a less restrictive setting.

(6) The judicial proceedings described in this subdivision shall not delay a nonminor dependent’s access to medically necessary services as defined in Section 14059.5 and Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code, which may include voluntary admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility for inpatient
 psychiatric services, while the judicial proceedings are ongoing.

(f) (1) (A) No later than 60 days following the admission of a minor to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, and every 30 days thereafter, the court shall hold a review hearing on the minor’s placement in the facility and the medical necessity of the placement.

(B) If the hearing described in subparagraph (A) coincides with the date for a review hearing pursuant to Section 727.2, the court may hold the hearing simultaneously with the status review hearing.

(C) At the hearing described in subparagraph (A), the court shall consider all of the following:

(i) Whether the minor, or parent or guardian, continues to consent to the voluntary admission made pursuant to this section.

(ii) Whether the minor continues to suffer from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the facility.

(iii) Whether there continues to be no other available hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service which might better serve the minor’s medical needs and best interest.

(iv) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, continues to meet its legal obligation to provide services to the minor.

(v) The county probation department’s plan as described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10, and the department’s actions to implement that plan.

(D) If the court finds that the minor or their parent or guardian continues to give voluntary consent to admission, that the minor continues to suffer from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the facility, and that there continues to be no other available hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service which might better serve the minor’s medical need and best interest, the court may authorize continued inpatient psychiatric services for the minor in a psychiatric residential treatment facility. If the child has been in the facility for over 30 days, there shall be a
 rebuttable presumption that the facility is not the least restrictive alternative to serve the child’s medical need and best interest.

(E) (i) If the court finds that the minor or their parent or
 guardian no longer consents to the minor’s admission, the court shall direct the probation officer to work immediately with the facility for discharge to a different setting with the appropriate and necessary services and supports in place. A statement from the minor’s attorney that the minor no longer gives voluntary consent to the admission to the facility may be sufficient to support a finding that the minor no longer gives voluntary consent. The court shall set a hearing no later than 30 days to verify that the minor has been discharged. If the minor has not been discharged by the time of the hearing, the court shall issue any and all orders to effectuate the child’s immediate discharge, including exercising its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 727. This paragraph does not preclude involuntary detention of the minor pursuant to the requirements of the Children’s Civil Commitment
 and Mental Health Treatment Act of 1988 or Lanterman-Petris-Short Act if the minor withdraws voluntary consent. This paragraph does not preclude a parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or the minor’s probation officer or attorney from arranging the minor’s discharge from the facility without a court order.

(ii) If the court’s determination under clause (i) includes a determination that the minor should receive treatment through another hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service, the court shall hold a hearing no later than 60 days from the child’s discharge to ensure that the other services have been provided.

(F) If the court determines the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, failed to meet its
 legal obligation to provide services to the minor, it may direct the social worker to engage with the facility to ensure the minor is receiving all necessary services. If necessary, the court may exercise its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 727.

(G) The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the county probation department makes all necessary arrangements for the minor’s discharge promptly and that all services and supports are in place for the minor’s successful transition to a different setting. The court may direct the social worker to work with the facility on the child’s aftercare plans as appropriate based on the child’s progress.

(2) (A) No later than 60 days following the admission of a nonminor dependent to a psychiatric residential
 treatment facility, and every 30 days thereafter, the court shall hold a review hearing on the child or nonminor dependent’s placement in the facility and the medical necessity of that placement.

(B) If the hearing described in subparagraph (A) coincides with the date for a hearing pursuant to Sections 366.31 and 727.25, the court may hold the hearing simultaneously with the status review hearing.

(C) At the hearing in subparagraph (A), the court shall consider all of the following:

(i) Whether the nonminor dependent continues to consent to the voluntary admission made pursuant to this section.

(ii) Whether there is an available less restrictive setting
 sufficient to meet the nonminor dependent’s needs, including a less restrictive facility or community-based care.

(iii) Whether the nonminor dependent continues to meet medical necessity for care and treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility.

(iv) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, continues to meet its legal obligation to provide services to the nonminor dependent.

(v) The county child welfare agency’s plan as described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10, and the agency’s actions to implement that plan.

(D) If the court finds at any review hearing that the
 nonminor dependent continues to voluntarily consent to admission and that the evidence supports the nonminor dependent’s need for care and treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility, the court shall enter these findings in the record and direct the probation officer to transmit them to the facility or interdisciplinary team. If the nonminor dependent continues to voluntarily consent to admission, the court may direct the probation officer to work with the facility on the nonminor dependent’s aftercare plans as appropriate based on the nonminor dependent’s needs to achieve independence.

(E) (i) If the court finds that the nonminor dependent no longer voluntarily consents, the court shall direct the probation officer to notify the facility and immediately work with the nonminor dependent and the
 facility for discharge to a less restrictive setting with the appropriate and necessary services and supports in place. A statement from the nonminor dependent’s attorney that the nonminor dependent no longer gives voluntary consent to the admission to the facility may be sufficient to support a finding that the nonminor dependent no longer gives voluntary consent. The court shall set a hearing no later than 30 days to verify that the nonminor dependent has been discharged. If the nonminor dependent has not been discharged by the time of the hearing, the court shall issue any and all orders to effectuate the nonminor dependents’s immediate discharge, including exercising its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 727. This paragraph does not preclude involuntary detention of the nonminor dependent pursuant to the requirements of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act if the nonminor dependent withdraws
 voluntary consent. This paragraph does not preclude the nonminor dependent from arranging their own discharge from the facility without a court order.

(ii) If the court’s determination under clause (i) includes a determination that the nonminor dependent should receive treatment through another hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service, the court shall hold a hearing no later than 60 days from the nonminor dependent’s discharge to ensure that the other services have been provided.

(F) This paragraph does not prevent the court from holding review hearings more frequently at its discretion.

(g) (1) The court’s order authorizing a request for admission to a psychiatric
 residential treatment facility shall be effective until the first of the following events occurs: (1) the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian, or minor if admission was granted pursuant to Section 6552, or nonminor dependent withdraws consent for the minor or nonminor dependent to be present in the psychiatric residential treatment facility, (2) the court finds that the minor or nonminor dependent no longer suffers from a mental disorder that may reasonably expected to be ameliorated by the treatment offered by the facility or that the psychiatric residential treatment facility is no longer the least restrictive setting for the treatment of the minor’s mental health needs, or (3) the court makes a superseding order. This section does not require a court order to discharge a patient if the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, minor, or nonminor dependent withdraw their consent for admission.

(2) Whenever a minor or nonminor dependent is discharged due to revocation of consent to admission, the county probation department shall, within two court days of being notified of the revocation of consent, file a petition pursuant to Section 778 requesting an order vacating the court’s authorization of the minor’s or nonminor dependent’s admission to the facility. This subdivision does not require a court order for the discharge of a minor arranged for by the child’s probation officer or attorney or nonminor dependent when consent to admission has been withdrawn.

(h) At any review hearing pursuant to Section 366.31, 727.2, or 727.25, if a minor or nonminor dependent has been admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, as defined in Section 1250.10, pursuant
 to the consent of a conservator, the court shall
 review the probation department’s plan developed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10. The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the probation department promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the minor or nonminor dependent is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition to a less restrictive setting. The court may direct the probation officer to work with the facility or, where appropriate, the minor’s or nonminor dependent’s court-appointed conservator to ensure the minor or nonminor dependent is receiving all necessary child welfare services and to develop the minor’s or nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan as appropriate based on the evidence of the minor’s or nonminor dependent’s progress.

(i) The
 documentation required by this section shall not contain information that is privileged or confidential under existing state
 or federal law or regulation without the appropriate wavier or consent.

(j) For purposes of this section, a “psychiatric residential treatment facility” refers to a psychiatric residential treatment facility defined in Section 1250.10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) All provisions in this section that apply to nonminor dependents shall apply equally to foster children who remain under juvenile court jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 303 after reaching the age of majority even if they do not meet the definition of “nonminor dependent” contained in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 27.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

727.2.

The purpose of this section is to provide a means to monitor the safety and well-being of every minor in foster care who has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and to ensure that everything reasonably possible is done to facilitate the safe and early return of the minor to the minor’s home or to establish an alternative permanent plan for the minor.

(a) If the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the juvenile court shall order the probation department to ensure the provision of reunification services to facilitate the safe return of the minor to the minor’s home or the permanent placement of the minor, and to address
 the needs of the minor while in foster care, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Reunification services need not be provided to a parent or legal guardian if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that one or more of the following is true:

(A) Reunification services were previously terminated for that parent or guardian, pursuant to Section 366.21, 366.22, or 366.25, or not offered, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, in reference to the same minor.

(B) The parent has been convicted of any of the following:

(i) Murder of another child of the parent.

(ii) Voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent.

(iii) Aiding or abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting to commit that murder or manslaughter described in clause (i) or (ii).

(iv) A felony assault that results in serious bodily injury to the minor or another child of the parent.

(C) The parental rights of the parent with respect to a sibling have been terminated involuntarily, and it is not in the best interest of the minor to reunify with the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(2) If no reunification services are offered to the parent or guardian, the permanency planning hearing, as described in Section 727.3, shall occur within 30 days of the date of the hearing at which the decision is made not to offer services.

(c) The status
 of every minor declared a ward and ordered to be placed in foster care shall be reviewed by the court no less frequently than once every six months. The six-month time periods shall be calculated from the date the minor entered foster care, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4. If the court so elects, the court may declare the hearing at which the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727 at the first status review hearing. It shall be the duty of the probation officer to prepare a written social study report pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 706.5, including an updated case plan, as described in Section 706.6, and submit the report to the court prior to each status review hearing, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.4. The social study report shall include all reports the probation officer relied upon in making their
 recommendations.

(d) Prior to any status review hearing involving a minor in the physical custody of a community care facility or foster family agency, the facility or agency may provide the probation officer with a report containing its recommendations. Prior to any status review hearing involving the physical custody of a foster parent, relative caregiver, preadoptive parent, or legal guardian, that person may present to the court a report containing the person’s recommendations. The court shall consider all reports and recommendations filed pursuant to subdivision (c) and pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) At any status review hearing prior to the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall consider the safety of the minor and make findings and orders which determine the following:

(1) The continuing
 necessity for and appropriateness of the placement. If the minor or nonminor dependent is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after October 1, 2021, or a community treatment facility on or after July 1, 2022, the court shall consider the evidence and documentation submitted in the social study pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 706.5 in making this determination.

(2) The extent of the probation department’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts, or in the case of a child 16 years of age or older with another planned permanent living arrangement, the ongoing and intensive efforts to safely return the minor to the minor’s home or to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the minor.

(3) Whether there should be any limitation on the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the minor. That limitation shall be specifically addressed in the court order and may not exceed what is necessary to protect the minor. If the court specifically limits the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the minor, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational decisions for the minor pursuant to Section 726.

(4) The extent of progress that has been made by the minor and parent or guardian toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.
